Utah statutes.
53A-3-701.   School and school district professional development plans.

(1) (a)  Each public school and school district shall develop and implement a systematic, comprehensive, and long-term plan for staff professional development.

(b)  Each school shall use its school community council, school directors, or a subcommittee or task force created by the school community council as provided in Section 53A-1a-108 to help develop and implement the plan.

(2)  Each plan shall include the following components:

(a)  an alignment of professional development activities at the school and school district level with:

(i)  the school improvement plan under Section 53A-1a-108.5;

(ii)  the School LAND Trust Program authorized under Section 53A-16-101.5;

(iii)  the Utah Performance Assessment System for Students under Title 53A, Chapter 1, Part 6, Achievement Tests;

(iv)  Sections 53A-6-101 through 53A-6-104 of the Educator Licensing and Professional Practices Act;

(v)  Title 53A, Chapter 9, Teacher Career Ladders; and

(vi)  Title 53A, Chapter 10, Educator Evaluation;

(b)  provision for the development of internal instructional leadership and support;

(c)  the periodic presence of all stakeholders at the same time in the professional development process, to include administrators, educators, support staff, parents, and students;

(d)  provisions for the use of consultants to enhance and evaluators to assess the effectiveness of the plan as implemented; and

(e)  the time required for and the anticipated costs of implementing and maintaining the plan.

(3) (a)  Each local school board shall review and either approve or recommend modifications for each school plan within its district so that each school's plan is compatible with the district plan.

(b)  The board shall:

(i)  provide positive and meaningful assistance to a school, if requested by its community council or school directors, in drafting and implementing its plan; and

(ii)  monitor the progress of each school plan and hold each school accountable for meeting the objectives of its plan.

(4)  The State Board of Education, through the superintendent of public instruction, shall work with school districts to identify the resources required to implement and maintain each school's and school district's professional development plan required under this section.

